North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163. Elections and Election Laws.
Article 2. Time of Elections to Fill Vacancies.

§ 163-8.
Filling vacancies in State executive offices.

If the office of Governor or Lieutenant Governor shall become vacant, the provisions of

G.S. 147-11.1

shall apply. If the office of any of the following officers shall be vacated by death, resignation, or otherwise than by expiration of term, it shall be the duty of the Governor to appoint another to serve until his successor
is elected and qualified: Secretary of State, Auditor, Treasurer, Superintendent of Public Instruction, Attorney General, Commissioner of Agriculture, Commissioner of Labor, and Commissioner of Insurance. Each such vacancy shall be
filled by election at the first election for members of the General Assembly that occurs more than 60 days after the vacancy has taken place, and the person chosen shall hold the office for the remainder of the unexpired four-year
term: Provided, that when a vacancy occurs in any of the offices named in this section and the term expires on the first day of January succeeding the next election for members of the General Assembly, the Governor shall appoint to
fill the vacancy for the unexpired term of the office.

Upon the occurrence of a vacancy in the office of any one of these officers for any of the causes stated in the preceding paragraph, the Governor may appoint an acting officer to perform the duties of that office until a person is appointed or elected
pursuant to this section and Article III, Section 7 of the State Constitution, to fill the vacancy and is qualified.

History.
1901, c. 89, ss. 4, 73; Rev., s. 4299; C.S., s. 5920; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; 1983, c. 324, s. 1; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 920, s. 5; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

Cross References.

As to the constitutional amendments by Session Laws 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 920, ss. 1 and 2, see N.C. Const., Art. III, § 7(3) and Art. IV, § 19.

§ 163-9.
Filling vacancies in State and district judicial offices.

Vacancies occurring in the offices of Justice of the Supreme Court, judge of the Court of Appeals, and judge of the superior court for causes other than expiration of term shall be filled by appointment of the Governor. An appointee to the office of Justice
of the Supreme Court or judge of the Court of Appeals shall hold office until January 1 next following the election for members of the General Assembly that is held more than 60 days after the vacancy occurs, at which time an election
shall be held for an eight-year term and until a successor is elected and qualified.

Except for judges specified in the next paragraph of this subsection, an appointee to the office of judge of superior court shall hold his place until the next election for members of the General Assembly that is held more than 60 days after the vacancy
occurs, at which time an election shall be held to fill the unexpired term of the office.Appointees for judges of the superior court from any district:

With only one resident judge; or

In which no county is subject to section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965,

shall hold the office until the next election of members of the General Assembly that is held more than 60 days after the vacancy occurs, at which time an election shall be held to fill an eight-year term.

When the unexpired term of the office in which the vacancy has occurred expires on the first day of January succeeding the next election for members of the General Assembly, the Governor shall appoint to fill that vacancy for the unexpired term of the
office.

Vacancies in the office of district judge which occur before the expiration of a term shall not be filled by election. Vacancies in the office of district judge shall be filled in accordance with

G.S. 7A-142

.

History.
1901, c. 89, ss. 4, 73; Rev. s. 4299; C.S., s. 5920; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; 1969, c. 44, s. 81; 1979, c. 494; 1981, c. 763, s. 3; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 920, s. 6; 1995, c. 98, s. 1; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 9, s. 21; 2017-6,
s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

Local Modification.

Wake: 2015-4, s. 1(a).

Cross References.

As to the constitutional amendments by Session Laws 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 920, ss. 1 and 2, see N.C. Const., Art. III, § 7(3) and Art. IV, § 19.

§ 163-10.
Filling vacancy in office of district attorney.

Any vacancy occurring in the office of district attorney for causes other than expiration of term shall be filled by appointment of the Governor. An appointee shall hold his place until the next election for members of the General Assembly that is held
more than 60 days after the vacancy occurs, at which time an election shall be held to fill the unexpired term of the office: Provided, that when the unexpired term of the office in which the vacancy has occurred expires on the first
day of January succeeding the next election for members of the General Assembly, the Governor shall appoint to fill that vacancy for the unexpired term of the office.

History.
1901, c. 89, ss. 4, 73; Rev., s. 4299; C.S., s. 5920; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; 1973, c. 47, s. 2; 1977, c. 265, s. 2; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 920, s. 7; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

Cross References.

As to the constitutional amendments by Session Laws 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 920, ss. 1 and 2, see N.C. Const., Art. III, § 7(3) and Art. IV, § 19.

§ 163-11.
Filling vacancies in the General Assembly.

If a vacancy shall occur in the General Assembly by death, resignation, or otherwise than by expiration of term, the Governor shall immediately appoint for the unexpired part of the term the person recommended by the political party executive committee
provided by this section. The Governor shall make the appointment within seven days of receiving the recommendation of the appropriate committee. If the Governor fails to make the appointment within the required period, he shall
be presumed to have made the appointment and the legislative body to which the appointee was recommended is directed to seat the appointee as a member in good standing for the duration of the unexpired term.

If the district consists solely of one county and includes all of that county, the Governor shall appoint the person recommended by the county executive committee of the political party with which the vacating member was affiliated when elected, it being
the party executive committee of the county which the vacating member was resident.

If the district consists solely of one county but includes less than all of the county, the Governor shall appoint the person recommended by the county executive committee of the political party with which the vacating member was affiliated when elected,
it being the county executive committee of the county which the vacating member was resident, provided that in voting only those county executive committee members who reside in the district shall be eligible to vote.

If the district consists of more than one county, the Governor shall appoint for the unexpired portion of the term the person recommended by the State House of Representatives district committee or the Senatorial district committee of the political party
with which the vacating member was affiliated when elected. In the case where all of a county is included within a district, the county convention or county executive committee of that political party shall elect or appoint at
least one member from that county to serve on the State House of Representatives district executive committee or State Senatorial district executive committee. In the case where only part of a county is included within a district,
the county convention or county executive committee of that political party shall elect or appoint at least one member from that county to serve on the State House of Representatives district committee or the State Senatorial district
committee, but only the delegates to the county convention or the members of the county executive committee who reside in the district may vote in electing the district committee member. When the State House of Representatives
district committee or the State Senatorial district committee meets, a member shall be entitled to cast for his county (or the part of his county within the district) one vote for each 300 persons or major fraction thereof residing
within that county, or in the case where less than the whole county is in the district one vote for each 300 persons or major fraction thereof residing in that part of the district within the county.A county convention or county
executive committee may elect more than one member to the district committee but in the event that more than one member is selected from that county, then each member shall cast an equal share of the votes allotted to the county.

No person is eligible for appointment to fill a vacancy in the Senate or the House of Representatives under this section, unless that person would have been qualified to vote as an elector for that office if an election were to be held on the date of
appointment. This section is intended to implement the provisions of Section 8 of Article VI of the Constitution.

History.
1901, c. 89, s. 74; Rev., s. 4298; C.S., s. 5919; 1947, c. 505, s. 1; 1953, c. 1191, s. 1; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; 1973, c. 35; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1265, s. 3; 2007-391, s. 27(b); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-12.
Filling vacancy in United States Senate.

Whenever there shall be a vacancy in the office of United States Senator from this State, whether caused by death, resignation, or otherwise than by expiration of term, the Governor shall appoint to fill the vacancy until an election shall be held to
fill the office. If the Senator was elected as the nominee of a political party, the Governor shall appoint from a list of three persons recommended by the State executive committee of the political party with which the vacating member
was affiliated when elected if that party executive committee makes recommendations within 30 days of the occurrence of the vacancy. The Governor shall issue a writ for the election of a Senator to be held at the time of the first
election for members of the General Assembly that is held more than 60 days after the vacancy occurs. The person elected shall hold the office for the remainder of the unexpired term. The election shall take effect from the date of
the canvassing of the returns.

History.
1913, c. 114, ss. 1, 2; C.S., ss. 6002, 6003; 1929, c. 12, s. 2; 1955, c. 871, s. 6; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; 1985, c. 759, s. 2; 2013-381, s. 8.1; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-102, s. 1; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-13.
Filling vacancy in United States House of Representatives.

Special Election. — If at any time after expiration of any Congress and before another election, or if at any time after an election, there shall be a vacancy in this State’s representation in the House of Representatives of the United States Congress,
the Governor shall issue a writ of election, and by proclamation fix the date on which an election to fill the vacancy shall be held in the appropriate congressional district.

Nominating Procedures. — If a congressional vacancy occurs beginning on the tenth day before the filing period ends under G.S. 163-106(c) preceding the next succeeding general election, candidates for the special election to fill the vacancy shall not
be nominated in primaries. Instead, nominations may be made by the political party congressional district executive committees in the district in which the vacancy occurs. The chairman and secretary of each political party congressional
district executive committee nominating a candidate shall immediately certify his name and party affiliation to the State Board so that it may be printed on the special election ballots.If the congressional vacancy occurs before
the tenth day before the filing period ends under G.S. 163-106(c) prior to the next succeeding general election, the Governor shall call a special primary for the purpose of nominating candidates to be voted on in a special election
called by the Governor in accordance with the provisions of subsection (a) of this section. Such a primary election shall be conducted in accordance with the general laws governing primaries, except that the opening and closing
dates for filing notices of candidacy with the State Board shall be fixed by the Governor in his call for the special primary. The Governor may also fix the absentee voting period for the special election and for the special first
primary, but such period shall not be less than 30 days.

History.
1901, c. 89, s. 60; Rev., s. 4369; C.S., s. 6007; 1947, c. 505, s. 5; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; 1985, c. 759, ss. 3-5; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§§ 163-14 through 163-18.

Reserved for future codification purposes.